Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.090

Distribution of powers—Assignment of duties.

The commission by ordinance shall determine what powers and duties are to be performed in each department, shall prescribe the powers and duties of the various officers and employees and make such rules and regulations for the efficient and economical conduct of the business of the city as it may deem necessary and proper. The commission may assign particular officers and employees to one or more departments and may require an officer or employee to perform duties in two or more departments.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.090. Prior: 1911 c 116 s 11, part; RRS s 9100, part.]